Rhode Island, session 2025, SB134.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 14-5-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 14-5 entitled "Treatment of
Juveniles for Chemical Dependency" is hereby amended to read as follows:
14-5-8. Possession of one ounce (1 oz.) or less of marijuana Possession of two ounces
(2 oz.) or less of marijuana.
Notwithstanding any public, special, or general law to the contrary, possession of one
ounce (1 oz.) two ounces (2 oz.) or less of marijuana, as defined in § 21-28-1.02, by a child under
seventeen (17) years of age and who is not exempted from penalties pursuant to chapter 28.6 of
title 21, shall constitute a status an offense pursuant to § 14-1-3(11)(vii) and forfeiture of the
marijuana. The family court may order a substance-abuse assessment and, if recommended,
substance-abuse treatment. The parents or legal guardian of any child under seventeen (17) years
of age shall be notified of the offense.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000880
========